Utah statutes.
63C-14-302.   Commission meetings -- Quorum -- Bylaws -- Staff support.

(1) (a)  Until November 30, 2014, the commission shall meet at least quarterly but no more frequently than once a month.

(b)  After November 30, 2014, the commission shall meet as directed by the governor, the Legislature, or the Legislative Management Committee in conjunction with direction given under Subsection 63C-14-301(2).

(2)  A majority of the commission members constitutes a quorum, and the action of a majority of a quorum constitutes action of the commission.

(3)  The commission may adopt bylaws to govern its operations and proceedings.

(4)  The Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel shall provide staff support to the commission.



Enacted by Chapter 62, 2013 General Session

